Utah statutes.
34A-2-201.   Employers to secure workers' compensation benefits for employees -- Methods.

An employer shall secure the payment of workers' compensation benefits for its employees by:

(1)  insuring, and keeping insured, the payment of this compensation with the Workers' Compensation Fund;

(2)  insuring, and keeping insured, the payment of this compensation with any stock corporation or mutual association authorized to transact the business of workers' compensation insurance in this state; or

(3)  obtaining approval from the division in accordance with Section 34A-2-201.5 to pay direct compensation as a self-insured employer in the amount, in the manner, and when due as provided for in this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.



Amended by Chapter 222, 2000 General Session

